Hawaii statutes.
§182-4 Mining leases on state lands.
(a) If any mineral is discovered or known to exist on state lands, any
interested person may notify the board of the person's desire to apply for a
mining lease. The notice shall be accompanied by a fee of $100 together with a
description of the land desired to be leased, the minerals involved, and any
information and maps that the board by rule may prescribe. As soon as
practicable thereafter, the board shall cause a public notice to be given in
the county where the lands are located, at least once in each of three
successive weeks, setting forth the description of the land, and the minerals
desired to be leased. The board may hold the public auction of the mining
lease within six months from the date of the first notice or any further time
that may be reasonably necessary. Whether or not the state land sought to be
auctioned is then being utilized or put to some productive use, the board,
after due notice of public hearing to all parties in interest, within six weeks
from the date of the first notice or any further time that may be reasonably
necessary, shall determine whether the proposed mining operation or the
existing or reasonably foreseeable future use of the land would be of greater
benefit to the State. If the board determines that the existing or reasonably
foreseeable future use would be of greater benefit to the State than the
proposed mining use of the land, it shall disapprove the application for a
mining lease of the land without putting the land to auction. The board shall
determine the area to be offered for lease and, after due notice of public
hearing to all parties in interest, may modify the boundaries of the land
areas. At least thirty days prior to the holding of any public auction, the board
shall cause a public notice to be given in the State at least once in each of
three successive weeks, setting forth the description of the land, the minerals
to be leased, and the time and place of the auction. Bidders at the public
auction may be required to bid on the amount of annual rental to be paid for
the term of the mining lease based on an upset price fixed by the board, a
royalty based on the gross proceeds or net profits, cash bonus, or any
combination or other basis and under any terms and conditions that may be set
by the board.

(b) Any provisions to the contrary
notwithstanding, if the person who discovers the mineral discovers it as a
result of exploration permitted under section 182-6, and if that person bids at
the public auction on the mining lease for the right to mine the discovered
mineral and is unsuccessful in obtaining such lease, that person shall be
reimbursed by the person submitting the highest successful bid at public
auction for the direct or indirect costs incurred in the exploration of the
land, excluding salaries, attorney's fees, and legal expenses. The department
may review and approve all expenses and costs that may be reimbursed.

(c) Notwithstanding any other law to the
contrary, an application for a mining lease submitted pursuant to this section
may be granted by the board in accordance with the procedures set forth in
section 171-95.3. [L 1963, c 11, pt of §1; Supp, §99A-4; HRS §182-4; am L 1978,
c 135, §3; am L 1983, c 296, §2; gen ch 1985; am L 1998, c 2, §45; am L 2016, c
220, §4]

Revision Note

In subsection (b),
"attorneys fees" substituted for "attorney fee's".

Cross References

Strip mining, see
chapter 181.

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next